Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB209.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 441 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) (a) The External Detainee Fatality Review Panel is hereby created and
established for the purpose of conducting reviews of all fatalities of
individuals who were committed to or in the custody of:
1. A law enforcement agency as defined in KRS 70.294;
2. A county jail or regional detention center; or
3. Any facility operated by:
a. The Department of Corrections;
b. The Department of Juvenile Justice; or
c. A private entity contracted with either the Department of
Corrections or the Department of Juvenile Justice;
at the time of death or at the time medical assistance was sought for a
condition that led to the individual’s death.
(b) The External Detainee Fatality Review Panel shall not review the death of
an individual:
1. That occurred in a nonresidential community-based program, house
arrest program, day reporting program, or private work program; or
2. Who was deemed to be:
a. Absent without leave;
b. An escapee; or
c. On long-term transfer to another jurisdiction.
(c) The External Detainee Fatality Review Panel shall be attached to the
Justice and Public Safety Cabinet for staff and administrative purposes but
Page 1 of 10
XXXX 2/11/2026 3:22 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1733
shall operate as an independent entity designed to promote carceral safety
throughout the Commonwealth.
(2) The External Detainee Fatality Review Panel shall be composed of:
(a) The following sixteen (16) nonvoting members:
1. The House chair of the Committee on Judiciary, ex officio;
2. The Senate chair of the Committee on Judiciary, ex officio;
3. The Attorney General, ex officio, or designee;
4. The secretary of the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet, ex officio, or
designee;
5. The commissioner of the Department of Corrections, ex officio;
6. The commissioner of the Department of Juvenile Justice, ex officio;
7. The public advocate, ex officio, or designee;
8. The state medical examiner, ex officio, or designee;
9. A representative from the Kentucky Jailers Association;
10. A representative from the Kentucky Association of Counties;
11. A representative from the Kentucky County Attorneys Association;
12. A representative from the Kentucky Commonwealth's Attorneys'
Association;
13. A representative from the Kentucky County Judge/Executive
Association;
14. A peace officer appointed by the commissioner of the Department of
Kentucky State Police who possesses experience investigating detainee
deaths that occurred while in state or local custody;
15. A formerly incarcerated individual appointed by the Governor; and
16. A representative from a community-based organization that advocates
for the interests of incarcerated individuals, appointed by the
Governor; and
Page 2 of 10
XXXX 2/11/2026 3:22 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1733
(b) The following seven (7) voting members:
1. Two (2) retired judges appointed by the Governor who may be
chosen from a list of six (6) possible candidates supplied by the
Chief Justice of the Supreme Court of Kentucky;
2. Two (2) board-certified pathologists appointed by the Governor;
3. A qualified mental health professional as defined in KRS
202A.011, who shall be appointed by the Attorney General;
4. A citizen of the Commonwealth who shall be appointed by the
Governor, who may be chosen from a list of three (3) possible
candidates supplied by the President of the Senate; and
5. A citizen of the Commonwealth who shall be appointed by the
Governor, who may be chosen from a list of three (3) possible
candidates supplied by the Speaker of the House of
Representatives.
(3) The seven (7) voting members appointed under subsection (2)(b) of this section
shall vote to elect a chairperson from among the voting members. The voting
member chosen as chairperson shall serve as chairperson for the entirety of his
or her term. The voting members shall also vote to establish procedures for the
panel, including the votes necessary to take actions authorized by this section.
(4) (a) Terms of the voting members shall expire on June 30 each year and
thereafter until a successor is appointed and accepts appointment.
(b) Successors for the voting members shall be appointed by the respective
appointing authorities for terms of two (2) years, and until successors are
appointed and accept their appointments. Members shall be eligible for
reappointment. Vacancies in the membership of the panel shall be filled in
the same manner as the original appointments.
(c) At any time, a panel member shall recuse himself or herself from the review
Page 3 of 10
XXXX 2/11/2026 3:22 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1733
of a case if the panel member believes he or she has a personal or private
conflict of interest.
(d) If a voting panel member is absent from two (2) or more consecutive,
regularly scheduled meetings, the member shall be considered to have
resigned and shall be replaced with a new member in the same manner as
the original appointment.
(e) If a voting panel member is proven to have violated subsection (17) of this
section, the member shall be removed from the panel and replaced with a
new member in the same manner as the original appointment.
(5) The panel shall meet at least quarterly. In addition to the required quarterly
panel meeting, the panel may meet upon the call of the chairperson of the panel.
(6) Members of the panel shall receive no compensation for their duties related to the
panel but shall be reimbursed for expenses incurred in accordance with state
guidelines and administrative regulations.
(7) Each law enforcement agency, jailer, the commissioner of the Department of
Corrections, and the commissioner of the Department of Juvenile Justice shall
submit, as appropriate, the following documents to the panel within thirty (30)
days of the death of a detainee:
(a) Any coroner's report generated in response to the death;
(b) Any initial investigation report conducted by the entity that had custody over
the deceased detainee; and
(c) Any extraordinary occurrence report related to the death of a detainee.
(8) Administrative staff assigned to the panel shall use the information collected
pursuant to subsection (7) of this section to compile a list of detainee deaths from
the preceding quarter which shall be presented to the panel in advance of a
meeting of the panel, along with unredacted copies of the information collected
pursuant to subsection (7) of this section.
Page 4 of 10
XXXX 2/11/2026 3:22 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1733
(9) After review of the list and information compiled pursuant to subsection (8) of
this section, the panel may vote to request further information or records relating
to any detainee fatality. Upon a request by the panel, any law enforcement
agency, county jail or regional detention center, the Office of the Kentucky State
Medical Examiner, the Department of Corrections, the Department of Juvenile
Justice, or any agency, organization, or entity involved with providing services or
investigating incidents pertaining to deceased detainees shall provide to the panel
any requested information or records within a reasonable time period established
by the panel. The requested information or records may include but are not
limited to:
(a) County jail or regional detention center, law enforcement agency,
Department of Corrections, or Department of Juvenile Justice records and
documentation regarding the deceased detainee at the time of booking,
during detention, at the time of or subsequent to the incident leading to the
fatality, including all records and documentation set out in this paragraph:
1. Any actions taken by law enforcement, the county jail or regional
detention center, Department of Corrections, or Department of
Juvenile Justice on behalf of or regarding the deceased detainee
during arrest or booking;
2. Any records of services to the detainee provided by the law
enforcement agency, county jail or regional detention center,
Department of Corrections, or Department of Juvenile Justice staff, or
any agencies or individuals contracted to provide services by the
county jail or regional detention center, Department of Corrections, or
Department of Juvenile Justice;
3. Any documentation relating to any investigation of the fatality,
including all extraordinary occurrence reports and video or audio
Page 5 of 10
XXXX 2/11/2026 3:22 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1733
recordings relating to the detainee; and
4. Any documentation of actions taken as a result of the detainee fatality;
(b) Any reports from the Cabinet for Health and Family Services, Office of
Inspector General, if an incident occurred due to actions of a licensed
healthcare provider while providing services in a county jail or regional
detention center, state prison, or facility operated by Department of Juvenile
Justice;
(c) Any available records from the Administrative Office of the Courts
regarding the deceased detainee’s history of arrests and convictions;
(d) Any available records from the Department of Kentucky State Police
regarding the deceased detainee’s history of arrests;
(e) Any autopsy reports;
(f) Any emergency medical service, fire department, law enforcement, coroner,
and other first responder reports regarding the deceased detainee, including
but not limited to photographs, video recordings, and interviews with
witnesses; and
(g) Any records of medical and behavioral health services provided to the
deceased detainee during detention in the county jail or regional detention
center, state prison, or youth development center, including but not limited
to all records and documentation set out in this paragraph:
1. Primary care records, including progress notes; assessment of
behavioral health problems; assessment of detainee suicidal thinking
or attempts completed by the county jail, regional detention center,
state prison, or youth development center, or by a statewide suicide
prevention program; and descriptions of all medical or behavioral
health services provided to the deceased detainee during all detention
episodes of the deceased detainee;
Page 6 of 10
XXXX 2/11/2026 3:22 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1733
2. Notes and records of all law enforcement officers who detained or had
physical contact with the deceased detainee relating to the
incarceration during which the fatality occurred prior to the booking
of the detainee in the county jail, regional detention center, or facility
operated by the Department of Juvenile Justice;
3. Hospitalization and emergency department records regarding the
deceased detainee and actions subsequent to the fatality;
4. Dental records;
5. Specialist records; and
6. All photographs of injuries of the deceased detainee that are available.
(10) Each panel member shall be provided with unredacted copies of all information
or records submitted pursuant to subsection (9) of this section.
(11) If the facts of a case warrant additional expertise, the panel may seek the advice
of experts such as persons specializing in the fields of psychiatric and forensic
medicine, nursing, psychology, social work, education, law enforcement, family
law, or other related fields.
(12) The panel shall post updates regarding findings and recommendations after each
meeting to the website of the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet.
(13) The panel chairperson or other requested persons shall report a summary of the
panel's discussions and proposed or actual recommendations to the Interim Joint
Committees on Judiciary and State Government at the request of a committee co-
chair. The goal of each committee shall be to ensure impartiality regarding the
operations of the panel during its review process.
(14) The panel shall publish an annual report by December 1 of each year consisting
of findings and recommendations for system and process improvements to help
prevent detainee fatalities. The report shall be submitted to the Governor, the
secretary of the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet, the Chief Justice of the
Page 7 of 10
XXXX 2/11/2026 3:22 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1733
Supreme Court, the Attorney General, and the director of the Legislative
Research Commission for distribution to the appropriate committees.
(15) (a) Information and record copies that are confidential under state or federal
law and are provided to the External Detainee Fatality Review Panel by the
Justice and Public Safety Cabinet, the Department of Corrections, the
Cabinet for Health and Family Services, county jails or regional detention
centers, or any agency, organization, or entity for review shall not become
the information and records of the panel and shall not lose their
confidentiality by virtue of the panel’s access to the information and
records.
(b) The original information and records used to generate information and
record copies provided to the panel in accordance with subsections (7) and
(9) of this section shall be maintained by the appropriate agency in
accordance with state and federal law and shall be subject to the Kentucky
Open Records Act, KRS 61.870 to 61.884. All open records requests shall be
made to the appropriate agency and not to the External Detainee Fatality
Review Panel or any of the panel members.
(c) Information and record copies provided to the panel for review shall be
exempt from the Kentucky Open Records Act, KRS 61.870 to 61.884. At the
conclusion of the panel’s examination, all copies of information and
records provided to the panel involving an individual case shall be destroyed
by the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet.
(16) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the portions of the External
Detainee Fatality Review Panel meetings during which an individual detainee
fatality case is reviewed or discussed by panel members may be a closed session,
subject to KRS 61.815(1), and may only occur following the conclusion of an
open session. At the conclusion of the closed session, the panel shall immediately
Page 8 of 10
XXXX 2/11/2026 3:22 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1733
convene an open session and give a summary of what occurred during the closed
session.
(17) Each member of the External Detainee Fatality Review Panel, any person
attending a closed panel session, and any person presenting information or
records on an individual detainee fatality shall not release information or records
not available under the Kentucky Open Records Act, KRS 61.870 to 61.884, to the
public.
(18) A member of the External Detainee Fatality Review Panel shall not be prohibited
from making a good-faith report to any state or federal agency of any
information or issue that the panel member believes should be reported or
disclosed in an effort to facilitate effectiveness and transparency in Kentucky’s
detainee protective services.
(19) A member of the External Detainee Fatality Review Panel shall not be held liable
for any civil damages or criminal penalties as a result of any action taken or
omitted in the performance of the member’s duties pursuant to this section,
except for violations of subsection (15), (16), or (17) of this section.
(20) Beginning in 2027, the Legislative Oversight and Investigations Committee shall
conduct an annual evaluation of the External Detainee Fatality Review Panel to
monitor the operations, procedures, and recommendations of the panel and shall
report its findings to the Legislative Research Commission.
Section 2. (1) By August 1, 2026, the appointing authorities specified in
Section 1 of this Act shall have appointed panel members. Initial terms of voting
members shall be staggered to provide continuity. Initial appointments shall be three (3)
members for terms of one (1) year, and four (4) members for terms of two (2) years.
(2) The voting panel members shall be appointed in the following order:
(a) One (1) retired judge pursuant to subsection (2)(b)1. of Section 1 of this Act
to a term of one (1) year;
Page 9 of 10
XXXX 2/11/2026 3:22 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1733
(b) One (1) pathologist pursuant to subsection (2)(b)2. of Section 1 of this Act to
a term of one (1) year;
(c) One (1) citizen of the Commonwealth pursuant to subsection (2)(b)4. of
Section 1 of this Act to a term of one (1) year;
(d) One (1) retired judge pursuant to subsection (2)(b)1. of Section 1 of this Act
to a term of two (2) years;
(e) One (1) pathologist pursuant to subsection (2)(b)2. of Section 1 of this Act to
a term of two (2) years;
(f) One (1) qualified mental health professional pursuant to subsection (2)(b)3. of
Section 1 of this Act to a term of two (2) years; and
(g) One (1) citizen of the Commonwealth pursuant to subsection (2)(b)5. of
Section 1 of this Act to a term of two (2) years.
Page 10 of 10
XXXX 2/11/2026 3:22 PM Jacketed